District of Columbia statutes.
21-103

Appointment of guardians of the person by court; limitation of number of wards.

(a)

When an infant has neither a natural nor testamentary guardian, a guardian of the person may be appointed by the Probate Court in its own discretion or on the application of a next friend of the infant.

(b)

Only trust companies may act as guardian of the person for more than five infants at one time, unless the infants are members of one family.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 738, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Cross References

Abuse of adults, duty to report, see § 7-1903.
Probate Court, jurisdiction, pleadings and practice, see §§ 11-921, 16-3101 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-103.
1973 Ed., § 21-103.